Indiana, session 2026, HB1261.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 27-7-12-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this
chapter, "aerial image" means an image of a named insured's
property captured from an airborne platform.
(a) (b) As used in this chapter, "cancellation" refers to a termination
of property insurance coverage that occurs during the policy term.
(b) (c) As used in this chapter, "nonpayment of premium" means the
failure of the named insured to discharge any obligation in connection
with the payment of premiums on policies of insurance subject to this
chapter, regardless of whether the payments are directly payable to the
insurer or its agent or indirectly payable under a premium finance plan
or extension of credit. The term includes the failure to pay dues or fees
where payment of the dues or fees is a prerequisite to obtaining or
continuing property insurance coverage.
(c) (d) As used in this chapter, "nonrenewal" or "nonrenewed" refers
to a termination of property insurance coverage that occurs at the end
of the policy term.
2026 IN 1261—LS 6636/DI 154


(d) (e) As used in this chapter, "renewal" or "to renew" refers to:
(1) the issuance and delivery by an insurer at the end of a policy
period of a policy superseding a policy previously issued and
delivered by the same insurer; or
(2) the issuance and delivery of a certificate or notice extending
the term of an existing policy beyond its policy period or term.
(f) As used in this chapter, "risk scoring system" means a
system used by an insurer to assess the likelihood of an individual
or entity filing a claim under a policy of insurance covering risks
to property located in Indiana.
(e) (g) As used in this chapter, "termination" means a cancellation
or nonrenewal. The term does not include:
(1) the requirement of a reasonable deductible;
(2) reasonable changes in the amount of insurance; or
(3) reasonable reductions in policy limits or coverage;
if the requirements or changes are directly related to the hazard
involved and are made on the renewal date for the policy. The term
does not include a transfer of a policy to another insurer.
SECTION 2. IC 27-7-12-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.196-2021,
SECTION 38, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Notice of nonrenewal by an insurer must:
(1) be in writing;
(2) be mailed to the named insured at the last known address of
the named insured;
(3) state the insurer's intention not to renew the policy upon
expiration of the current policy period;
(4) upon request of the named insured, be accompanied by a
written explanation of the specific reasons for the nonrenewal;
and
(5) be mailed to the named insured at least twenty (20) sixty (60)
days before the expiration of the current policy period; and
(6) comply with section 6.5(a)(1) of this chapter if the insurer
used aerial images to aid in its determination to not renew
property insurance coverage for a named insured.
(b) If the policy was procured by an independent insurance producer
licensed in Indiana, the insurer shall mail notice of nonrenewal to the
insurance producer not less than ten (10) days before the insurer mails
the notice to the named insured under subsection (a), unless the
obligation to notify the insurance producer is waived in writing by the
insurance producer.
(c) Notice of nonrenewal under this section is not required if:
(1) the named insured is transferred from an insurer to an affiliate
2026 IN 1261—LS 6636/DI 154


of the insurer for future coverage; and
(2) the transfer results in the same or broader coverage.
(d) If an insurer mails to an insured a renewal notice, bill,
certificate, or policy indicating the insurer's willingness to renew a
policy and the insured does not respond, the insurer is not required to
mail to the insured notice of intention not to renew.
SECTION 3. IC 27-7-12-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) When an insurer uses aerial images to aid in
its determination to not renew property insurance coverage for a
named insured, the insurer shall do the following:
(1) Ensure that the nonrenewal notice sent to the named
insured under section 4 of this chapter:
(A) includes information explaining:
(i) how the named insured can obtain copies of date
stamped aerial images that were taken not more than
twelve (12) months before the nonrenewal notice is sent
to the named insured and show the specific conditions on
the property that are out of compliance with the
insurer's underwriting guidelines; and
(ii) that the named insured has ten (10) days from the
date that the named insured receives the nonrenewal
notice to request the aerial images described in item (i);
and
(B) explains what steps the named insured can take to
reverse the insurer's decision to not renew the property
insurance coverage.
(2) Establish a point of contact and a process to enable a
named insured to provide documentation demonstrating that
any conditions on the property that were:
(A) out of compliance with the insurer's underwriting
guidelines; and
(B) identified by an aerial image;
have been cured.
(3) Establish an appeal process that allows a named insured
to correct any errors or misunderstandings related to the
property's risk score received under the insurer's risk scoring
system.
(4) Provide the named insured at least sixty (60) days after the
date the insurer identifies any conditions on the property that
are:
(A) out of compliance with the insurer's underwriting
2026 IN 1261—LS 6636/DI 154


guidelines; and
(B) identified by an aerial image;
to cure those conditions. Subject to subsection (b), if a named
insured submits documentation demonstrating that the
conditions have been cured, the insurer may not refuse to
renew property insurance coverage for a reason relating to
the conditions that have been cured.
(b) If a named insured submits documentation demonstrating
that the conditions described in subsection (a)(4) have been cured,
the insurer may inspect any work done to cure the conditions to
ensure that the conditions have actually been cured. If the insurer
determines that the work done to cure the conditions did not bring
the conditions into compliance with the insurer's underwriting
guidelines, the insurer shall notify the named insured that the
insurer's determination to not renew property insurance coverage
will be upheld.
(c) The department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
effectuate the provisions of this section.
2026 IN 1261—LS 6636/DI 154